Utah statutes.
58-16a-304.    Continuing education.

(1)  As a condition precedent for license renewal, each licensee shall, during each two-year licensure cycle or other cycle defined by rule, complete 30 hours of qualified continuing professional education in accordance with standards defined by rule.

(2)  If a renewal period is extended or shortened under Section 58-16a-303, the continuing education hours required for license renewal under this section shall be increased or decreased proportionally.

